Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2048.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Pennsylvania Civic Information Consortium Act.Section 2. Declaration of purpose.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The collapse of the local news industry in this Commonwealth has created a civic emergency. After years of corporate consolidation, hedge fund acquisition and newsroom layoffs, many communities in this Commonwealth have become news deserts, deprived of the public-interest journalism they once relied on.<--<--12345678910111213141516171819 (2) This is not merely a media industry crisis. Research shows that robust local journalism correlates with improved government performance, higher civic engagement and stronger community trust.(3) The private market alone no longer meets the public's need for locally rooted civic information.(4) To restore a healthy civic information ecosystem, a new public framework is needed to support, invest in and protect local journalism that serves all Pennsylvanians.(1) A STRONG AND DIVERSE LOCAL NEWS SECTOR IS ESSENTIAL TO THE FUNCTIONING OF DEMOCRACY. COMMUNITIES ACROSS THIS COMMONWEALTH RELY ON CREDIBLE, INDEPENDENT JOURNALISM TO STAY INFORMED ABOUT PUBLIC AFFAIRS AND TO PARTICIPATE MEANINGFULLY IN CIVIC LIFE.(2) RESEARCH CONSISTENTLY DEMONSTRATES THAT ACCESS TO RELIABLE REPORTING SUPPORTS TRANSPARENT GOVERNMENT, ENCOURAGES CIVIC ENGAGEMENT AND FOSTERS COMMUNITY TRUST.(3) RESEARCH ALSO DEMONSTRATES THAT MOST PENNSYLVANIANS SEEK OUT NEWS FROM TRUSTED, INDEPENDENT SOURCES, INCLUDING LOCAL PRINT AND DIGITAL NEWS ORGANIZATIONS.(4) MARKET PRESSURES AND STRUCTURAL CHANGES IN THE MEDIA LANDSCAPE HAVE MADE IT INCREASINGLY DIFFICULT FOR LOCAL NEWS ORGANIZATIONS TO SUSTAIN THE LEVEL OF COVERAGE RESIDENTS EXPECT AND DESERVE.(5) STRENGTHENING THIS COMMONWEALTH'S CIVIC INFORMATION INFRASTRUCTURE REQUIRES A COORDINATED PUBLIC FRAMEWORK THAT SUPPORTS, INVESTS IN AND SAFEGUARDS JOURNALISM THAT SERVES ALL PENNSYLVANIANS.(5) (6) The purpose of this act is to create an independent, nonpartisan, publicly funded nonprofit 20250HB2048PN2875 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 corporation, the Pennsylvania Civic Information Consortium.(6) (7) The Pennsylvania Civic Information Consortium will administer a competitive grant program supporting local journalism and civic information projects throughout this Commonwealth, with special emphasis on underserved populations and community-driven media models.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." The board of directors of the Pennsylvania Civic Information Consortium."Consortium." The Pennsylvania Civic Information Consortium established under section 4(a)."Eligible entity." A nonprofit organization, institution of higher education, library, community media outlet or other organization that demonstrates the ability to carry out a civic information or local journalism project in this Commonwealth."Funded project." A civic information or local journalism initiative that receives financial support through a grant awarded by the consortium under this act."HOST INSTITUTION." THE STATE LIBRARY SYSTEM OR AN INSTITUTION WITHIN THE STATE SYSTEM OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT ENTERS INTO A WRITTEN AGREEMENT WITH THE CONSORTIUM TO PROVIDE ADMINISTRATIVE, FISCAL OR LOGISTICAL SERVICES."Metrics." Objective performance measures used to evaluate the reach, quality and civic impact of funded projects."Pilot program." The initial two-year to three-year implementation phase of the consortium during which the consortium demonstrates proof of concept, establishes 20250HB2048PN2875 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administrative capacity, develops and tests grantmaking procedures and gathers data to inform the transition to a long-term funding model for the consortium."Underserved community." A community that lacks adequate access to reliable civic information or local news, including rural, low-income, minority, immigrant and limited-English proficient populations.Section 4. Establishment of consortium.(a) Establishment.--The Pennsylvania Civic Information Consortium is established as an independent, nonpartisan, nonprofit organization to support and strengthen THE PRODUCTION AND DISSEMINATION OF civic information and local journalism across this Commonwealth.(b) Incorporation.--The consortium shall be incorporated as a nonprofit corporation under 15 Pa.C.S. Pt. II Subpt. C (relating to nonprofit corporations). THE CONSORTIUM SHALL BE AN INDEPENDENT INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE COMMONWEALTH. THE CONSORTIUM SHALL NOT BE DEEMED AN EXECUTIVE OR ADMINISTRATIVE AGENCY, DEPARTMENT, BOARD OR COMMISSION OF THE COMMONWEALTH.(c) Public mission.--The consortium shall operate exclusively to carry out the public purposes of this act. The consortium shall be considered a public instrumentality for the purposes of grantmaking, accountability and public access.(d) Administrative housing.--The consortium may enter into an agreement with the State Library System, an institution within the State System of Higher Education or another public institution to provide administrative services, including payroll, procurement, human resources and information technology. An agreement under this subsection may not affect the consortium's status as an independent, nonpartisan, 20250HB2048PN2875 - 4 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nonprofit organization, its governance or its grantmaking authority. The consortium's employees, funds and records shall remain separate. A host institution may not direct or influence grant decisions or the content of a funded project.(D) INDEPENDENCE FROM CONTROL.--EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE EXPRESSLY PROVIDED UNDER THIS ACT, THE CONSORTIUM SHALL EXERCISE ITS DUTIES AND FUNCTIONS INDEPENDENTLY AND SHALL NOT BE SUBJECT TO THE SUPERVISION, DIRECTION OR CONTROL OF THE GOVERNOR OR AN EXECUTIVE OR ADMINISTRATIVE AGENCY, DEPARTMENT, BOARD OR COMMISSION OF THE COMMONWEALTH.(E) SEPARATE EXISTENCE.--THE CONSORTIUM, INCLUDING THE BOARD, AND ITS OFFICERS, EMPLOYEES, FUNDS AND RECORDS SHALL BE SEPARATE FROM AND NOT PART OF ANY EXECUTIVE OR ADMINISTRATIVE AGENCY, DEPARTMENT, BOARD OR COMMISSION OF THE COMMONWEALTH.SECTION 5. ADMINISTRATIVE, FISCAL OR LOGISTICAL SERVICES.(A) ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES PERMITTED.--THE CONSORTIUM MAY ENTER INTO A WRITTEN AGREEMENT WITH A HOST INSTITUTION UNDER WHICH THE HOST INSTITUTION PROVIDES ADMINISTRATIVE, FISCAL OR LOGISTICAL SERVICES.(B) NO SUPERVISORY AUTHORITY.--A HOST INSTITUTION MAY NOT SUPERVISE, MANAGE, DIRECT OR CONTROL THE CONSORTIUM, INCLUDING THE CONSORTIUM'S POLICIES, GRANTMAKING, PERSONNEL, BUDGET, BYLAWS OR STRATEGIC PRIORITIES.(C) NONINTERFERENCE.--A HOST INSTITUTION MAY NOT INFLUENCE OR ATTEMPT TO INFLUENCE A GRANT DECISION, FUNDED CONTENT, EDITORIAL JUDGMENT, GOVERNANCE DETERMINATIONS OR A PERFORMANCE EVALUATION.(D) PRESERVATION OF INDEPENDENCE.--THE PROVISION OF SERVICES UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO MAKE THE CONSORTIUM PART OF THE HOST INSTITUTION OR OTHERWISE TO AFFECT THE 20250HB2048PN2875 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CONSORTIUM'S INDEPENDENT LEGAL STATUS.Section 5 6. Duties of consortium.The consortium shall have the following duties:(1) Award competitive grants to eligible entities for projects that expand access to local news and civic information, with priority given to underserved communities.(2) Promote editorial independence and noninterference in the content of a funded project.(3) Support a diversity of media models, including nonprofit, for-profit, legacy, digital, ethnic and community-based outlets.(4) Establish formal and informal partnerships with State agencies and commissions, the State Library System, institutions of higher education, EXECUTIVE OR ADMINISTRATIVE AGENCIES, DEPARTMENTS, BOARDS OR COMMISSIONS OF THE COMMONWEALTH, municipal governments, school districts and other civic bodies to expand public access and civic participation.(5) Design and execute a pilot program.(6) Develop a long-term funding plan, including options such as a capitalized public trust and a dedicated fee on ultra-large digital advertising firms, exempting community outlets.(7) Establish measurable metrics and reporting requirements for each grant recipient.(8) Provide technical support to eligible entities seeking to build capacity or replicate successful models.(9) Publish and submit an annual report to the Governor and the General Assembly on grants awarded, funds disbursed, geographic distribution, project outcomes, performance 20250HB2048PN2875 - 6 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 against metrics and public input received.(10) Convene public summits and hearings across regions of this Commonwealth to solicit input on the consortium.(11) Administer training programs for journalists, community media producers and students to build local capacity for civic information gathering and distribution.(12) Research the relationship between local journalism, democratic governance and civic engagement.(13) Hold at least one annual public meeting in each of the northern, central and southern regions of this Commonwealth to solicit input on community needs, performance of grant recipients and future priorities of the consortium.(14) Establish and periodically review objective criteria to identify underserved communities for the purposes of awarding grants. The criteria may include measures of access to local news and civic information, population demographics, income levels and linguistic diversity, and shall guide the consortium's grantmaking policies and priorities.Section 6 7. Governance of consortium.(a) Board composition.--The consortium shall be governed by a board consisting of 15 members, including all of the following:(1) Representatives from journalism programs and media organizations.(2) Individuals with experience in civic engagement, community development or public policy.(3) Representatives from the State Library System or public library associations, NOT INCLUDING A HOST INSTITUTION.20250HB2048PN2875 - 7 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Individuals with expertise in nonprofit management, grant administration or financial oversight.(5) Representatives of underserved communities.(6) A representative of an ethnic or community media outlet.(7) A legal expert with experience in First Amendment or media law.(8) At least two persons affiliated with a public institution of higher education operating in this Commonwealth, NOT INCLUDING A HOST INSTITUTION.(b) Appointment.--(1) Initial members of the board shall be appointed as follows:(i) The Governor shall appoint one member.(ii) The President pro tempore of the Senate and the Minority Leader of the Senate shall each appoint one member.(iii) The Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives shall each appoint one member.(iv) The Chancellor of the State System of Higher Education, in consultation with the State Librarian, shall jointly appoint one member.(v) The six members appointed under subparagraphs (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv) shall, by a public, merit-based process consistent with the bylaws, appoint the remaining nine members necessary to reach the board size under subsection (a). Appointees under subparagraphs (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv) may not constitute a majority of the board.20250HB2048PN2875 - 8 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Initial and subsequent appointments shall reflect the expertise and perspectives listed under subsection (a).(3) Initial appointments shall be made within 60 days of the effective date of this paragraph.(c) Subsequent appointments.--After the initial board is seated, vacancies shall be filled through a public, merit-based process consistent with the bylaws to maintain the expertise and perspectives required under subsection (a) and to preserve the restriction in subsection (b)(1)(v) that appointees under subsection (b)(1)(i), (ii), (iii) and (iv) may not constitute a majority of the board. The board shall consist of 15 members at all times.(d) Conflicts and diversity in bylaws.--The bylaws shall ensure geographic, demographic and political diversity and shall include standards to prevent conflicts of interest. The bylaws shall contain safeguards to prevent dominance by a single political party or interest group. A single political party or interest group may not constitute a majority of the board's appointees, and the appointees under subsection (b)(1)(i), (ii), (iii) and (iv) may not constitute a majority of the board.(e) Board duties.--The board shall have the following duties:(1) Adopt bylaws and operational procedures.(2) Appoint and oversee an executive director.(3) Establish application guidelines and evaluation criteria.(4) Approve grants, budgets and financial reports.(5) Ensure that all funded projects are subject to metrics and public accountability.(6) Hold regular public meetings, including one annual 20250HB2048PN2875 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 public meeting in each of the northern, central and southern regions of this Commonwealth.(7) Oversee independent evaluations of grant outcomes and fiscal audits.(F) EXCLUSIVE GOVERNANCE AUTHORITY.--THE BOARD SHALL EXERCISE EXCLUSIVE AUTHORITY OVER THE GOVERNANCE, FINANCES AND OPERATIONS OF THE CONSORTIUM. AN OFFICER OR EMPLOYEE OF THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR OR AN EXECUTIVE OR ADMINISTRATIVE AGENCY, DEPARTMENT, BOARD OR COMMISSION OF THE COMMONWEALTH MAY NOT SUPERVISE, DIRECT OR CONTROL THE BOARD OR THE CONSORTIUM OR OTHERWISE INTERFERE WITH A LAWFUL ACTION OF THE BOARD.Section 7 8. Grantmaking priorities.In awarding grants, the consortium shall prioritize proposals that meet the following criteria:(1) Fill gaps in civic information or local journalism in underserved communities.(2) Support the development of public-interest journalism and civic media infrastructure.(3) Foster collaboration between media outlets, libraries, educational institutions and community organizations.(4) Increase civic participation and government accountability.(5) Promote equity and inclusion in newsroom practices, content and staffing.(6) Include community engagement in project design and implementation.(7) Offer replicable or scalable models that can expand impact Statewide.Section 8 9. Editorial independence.20250HB2048PN2875 - 10 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Protection of independence.--Grant recipients shall retain full editorial control. The consortium may not interfere in the editorial content of a funded project.(b) Commonwealth neutrality.--An officer or agent of the Commonwealth may not attempt to influence the editorial decisions of a grant recipient.Section 9 10. Public access and transparency.(a) Records.--The consortium, INCLUDING THE BOARD, shall maintain public records of its operations, including grant awards, applications, meeting minutes and annual reports, accessible under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(b) Website.--The consortium shall maintain a publicly accessible Internet website containing all of the following:(1) A searchable database of funded projects.(2) Application procedures and deadlines.(3) Reports and evaluations.(4) Schedules of meetings and public hearings.(5) Contact information and opportunities for public feedback.(C) MEETINGS.--THE CONSORTIUM, INCLUDING THE BOARD, SHALL CONDUCT MEETINGS AND HEARINGS IN ACCORDANCE WITH 65 PA.C.S. CH. 7 (RELATING TO OPEN MEETINGS).Section 10 11. Long-term funding strategy.(a) Transition from pilot.--Following the completion of the pilot program, the consortium shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly a plan for long-term funding.(b) Plan contents.--The plan may include all of the following:(1) Dedicated fees or levies and other sustainable 20250HB2048PN2875 - 11 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 revenue strategies identified by the consortium.(2) Creation of a capitalized public trust to provide ongoing financial support.(3) Recommendations for additional legislative or budgetary actions.Section 11 12. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2048PN2875 - 12 - <--1234567